Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 3. Legislative Department
§ 27. Special and local laws prohibited.

The legislature shall not pass local or special laws in any of the following enumerated cases, that is to say: For granting divorces; laying out, opening, altering or working roads or highways; vacating roads, town plats, streets, alleys or public grounds; locating or changing county seats; regulating county or township affairs; incorporation of cities, towns or villages; or changing or amending the charters of any cities, towns or villages; regulating the practice in courts of justice; regulating the jurisdiction and duties of justices of the peace, police magistrates or constables; changing the rules of evidence in any trial or inquiry; providing for changes of venue in civil or criminal cases; declaring any person of age; for limitation of civil actions; giving effect to any informal or invalid deeds; summoning or impaneling grand or petit juries; providing for the management of common schools; regulating the rate of interest on money; the opening or conducting of any election or designating the place of voting; the sale or mortgage of real estate belonging to minors or others under disability; chartering or licensing ferries or bridges or toll roads; chartering banks, insurance companies and loan and trust companies; remitting fines, penalties or forfeitures; creating[,] increasing, or decreasing fees, percentages or allowances of public officers; changing the law of descent; granting to any corporation, association or individual, the right to lay down railroad tracks, or any special or exclusive privilege, immunity or franchise whatever, or amending existing charter for such purpose; for punishment of crimes; changing the names of persons or places; for the assessment or collection of taxes; affecting estates of deceased persons, minors or others under legal disabilities; extending the time for the collection of taxes; refunding money paid into the state treasury, relinquishing or extinguishing, in whole or part, the indebtedness, liabilities or obligation of any corporation or person to this state or to any municipal corporation therein; exempting property from taxation; restoring to citizenship persons convicted of infamous crimes; authorizing the creation, extension or impairing of liens; creating offices or prescribing the powers or duties of officers in counties, cities, townships or school districts; or authorizing the adoption or legitimation of children. In all other cases where a general law can be made applicable no special law shall be enacted.

I. General Consideration.

II. Illustrative Cases.

I.General Consideration.

Cross references. —

As to special and local legislation, see art. 1, § 34, Wyo. Const. and art. 13, § 1, Wyo. Const.

Statute must operate alike upon all persons in same circumstances.

Meyer v. Kendig, 641 P.2d 1235,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 310

(Wyo. 1982).

This section does not prevent reasonable classification

of objects of legislation. State ex rel. Wyckoff v. Ross, 31 Wyo. 500, 228 P. 636,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 1924).

This section does not prohibit a classification of persons and things for the purpose of legislation which is reasonable in view of the object sought to be accomplished. Ludwig v. Harston, 65 Wyo. 134, 197 P.2d 252,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1948).

But classification cannot be made without reason

therefor and there must be substantial distinction between places embraced in legislation and places excluded. May v. Laramie, 58 Wyo. 240, 131 P.2d 300,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1942).

Classifications in statutes must be reasonable. —

The prohibition against special legislation does not mean that a statute must affect everyone in the same way; it only means that the classification contained in the statute must be reasonable, and that the statute must operate alike upon all persons or property in like or the same circumstances and conditions. Mountain Fuel Supply Co. v. Emerson, 578 P.2d 1351,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 292

(Wyo. 1978).

It is not what a law includes that makes it special,

but what it excludes. May v. Laramie, 58 Wyo. 240, 131 P.2d 300,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1942).

Legislation is special if it applies to all within a class without reason

appearing why it is not made to apply generally to all. May v. Laramie, 58 Wyo. 240, 131 P.2d 300,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1942).

Distinguishing peculiarity must exist giving rise to necessity for classification. —

To constitute general law, as opposed to special law, distinguishing peculiarity must exist giving rise to necessity for the law as to designated class. May v. Laramie, 58 Wyo. 240, 131 P.2d 300,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1942).

Effect of legislative determination of necessity. —

The courts will not interfere with the legislative determination that a special law was necessary, at least until it is clear that a general law could have been adopted. State ex rel. McPherren v. Carter, 30 Wyo. 22, 215 P. 477,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1923).

Burden on assailant to show classification is arbitrary. —

One who assails the classification in a law must carry the burden of showing that it does not rest upon any reasonable basis, but is essentially arbitrary. Bell v. Gray, 377 P.2d 924,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 1963); Mountain Fuel Supply Co. v. Emerson, 578 P.2d 1351,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 292

(Wyo. 1978).

And mere assertion of discrimination is insufficient. —

A person contesting the constitutionality of a statute must do more than make bold assertions of what he thinks is discriminatory. Bell v. Gray, 377 P.2d 924,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 1963).

Applied

in

State ex rel. Fawcett v. Board of County Comm'rs, 73 Wyo. 69, 273 P.2d 188,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(1954); Tennant v. Sinclair Oil & Gas Co., 355 P.2d 887,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Wyo. 1960); Hoem v. State, 756 P.2d 780,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 1988).

Quoted

in

Walgreen Co. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 70 Wyo. 193, 246 P.2d 767,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(1952); Miller v. Board of County Comm'rs, 79 Wyo. 502, 337 P.2d 262,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(1959); Simons v. Laramie County Sch. Dist., 741 P.2d 1116,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 496

(Wyo. 1987); White v. State, 784 P.2d 1313,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 246

(Wyo. 1989); Campbell County Sch. Dist. v. State, 907 P.2d 1238,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(Wyo. 1995).

Stated

in

Day v. Armstrong, 362 P.2d 137,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1961).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Wyoming Agric. College v. Irvine, 14 Wyo. 318, 84 P. 90,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(1906); Stutsman v. City of Cheyenne, 18 Wyo. 499, 113 P. 322,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(1911); Dillman v. State ex rel. Merrill, 20 Wyo. 404, 125 P. 367,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(1912); Town of Green River v. Bunger, 50 Wyo. 52, 58 P.2d 456,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(1936); In re West Hwy. San. & Imp. Dist., 77 Wyo. 384, 317 P.2d 495,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(1957); State ex rel. Fire Fighters Local v. Kingham, 420 P.2d 254,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 179

(Wyo. 1966); Board of County Comm'rs v. Justice Court No. Two, 529 P.2d 977,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 253

(Wyo. 1974); Cranston v. Thomson, 530 P.2d 726,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 1975); Neu v. Grant, 548 F.2d 281,

1977 U.S. App. LEXIS 10584

(10th Cir. 1977); In Interest of DG, 825 P.2d 369,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1992); Greenwalt v. Ram Rest. Corp., 2003 WY 77, 71 P.3d 717,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 2003).

Law reviews. —

For note, “Constitutionality of Special Bills for Private Relief,” see 6 Wyo. L.J. 261.

For article, “Governmental Immunity from Damage Actions in Wyoming — Part II,” see VII Land & Water L. Rev. 617 (1972).

For case note, “Worker's Compensation — Constitutionality of Wyoming's Co-employee Immunity Statute under Article 10, Section 4, of the Wyoming Constitution.Meyer v. Kendig, 641 P.2d 1235,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 310

(Wyo. 1982),” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 355 (1983).

For article, “An Essay on Wyoming Constitutional Interpretation,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 527 (1986).

For case note, “Worker's Compensation — The Dilemma of Co-Employee Immunity and the Confusion in the Aftermath of Mills II. Mills v. Reynolds, 837 P.2d 48,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 1992),” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 271 (1993).

II.Illustrative Cases.

Relinquishing indebtedness. —

Exemption from future taxes is not special law relinquishing indebtedness. Harkin v. Board of Comm'rs, 30 Wyo. 455, 222 P. 35,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1924).

An act exempting from taxation property of war veterans in the future does not relinquish any indebtedness, liability or obligation in violation of this section. State ex rel. Bd. of Comm'rs v. Snyder, 29 Wyo. 199, 212 P. 771,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1923).

Chapter 70, Laws 1937, did not violate this section prohibiting passage of “local laws” or “special laws” relinquishing or extinguishing indebtedness to this state or to any municipal corporation. Carter v. Thompson Realty Co., 58 Wyo. 279, 131 P.2d 297,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1942).

Statute providing that only taxpayers may vote at bond elections

is unconstitutional. Simpkin v. Rock Springs, 33 Wyo. 166, 237 P. 245,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1925).

Voting for judge in consolidated judicial district. —

Statute abolishing two judicial districts and attaching the counties to other districts, permitting the electors of those counties, before the law becomes effective, to vote for judge in the intended consolidated district, contains no provisions in violation of this constitutional provision. Brown v. Clark, 47 Wyo. 216, 34 P.2d 17,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1934).

Act forming Teton county. —

See Budge v. Board of Comm'rs, 29 Wyo. 35, 208 P. 874,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1922).

Legalizing defective organization of county. —

Curative statute legalizing defective organization of county was not invalid as special act organizing county or regulating its affairs or interfering with uniform operation of general laws. State ex rel. Budge v. Snyder, 30 Wyo. 287, 219 P. 735,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 1923).

Funding for county courts. —

Statute that allows legislature to deny full funding for county courts in counties having a population of less than 30,000 did not, on its face, violate the state constitution as special legislation. Board of County Comm'rs v. Geringer, 941 P.2d 742,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1997).

Establishing irrigation districts. —

In view of constitutional provision, irrigation districts must be established by general rather than special laws. Sullivan v. Blakesley, 35 Wyo. 73, 246 P. 918,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1926).

Necessity for classification of cities. —

Mere classification of cities for purpose of legislation without regard to necessity is special legislation and condemned by constitution. May v. Laramie, 58 Wyo. 240, 131 P.2d 300,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1942).

Law operating uniformly on cities is constitutional. —

A law operating uniformly on all cities of one class or all of several recognized classes was not unconstitutional. State ex rel. Diers v. Sheldon, 29 Wyo. 233, 213 P. 92,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1923).

Statute applicable to only 1 city. —

Mere fact that statute applies for time being only to one city does not necessarily render it unconstitutional as special legislation, although this fact may be considered in determining its constitutionality. May v. Laramie, 58 Wyo. 240, 131 P.2d 300,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1942).

Court may consider purpose of enactment creating second class cities. —

Purpose for which enactment creating cities of second class was passed may be considered in determining whether it is special or general legislation. May v. Laramie, 58 Wyo. 240, 131 P.2d 300,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1942).

And contemporaneous legislation applicable to cities of another class. —

In considering constitutionality of statute creating second class city and in determining what is reasonable or arbitrary classification, court may consider nearly contemporaneous enactment relating to cities of first class. May v. Laramie, 58 Wyo. 240, 131 P.2d 300,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1942).

Section applies to cities acting under special charter.

May v. Laramie, 58 Wyo. 240, 131 P.2d 300,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1942).

Grant to municipal corporation regarding public utility board. —

Legislature may constitutionally grant to municipal corporation right to elect or appoint board of public utilities. Stewart v. Cheyenne, 60 Wyo. 497, 154 P.2d 355,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1944).

Special improvements and assessments. —

An act authorizing special chartered cities having less than 10,000 inhabitants, to make special improvements and assessments in a specified manner, is not in violation hereof. McGarvey v. Swan, 17 Wyo. 120, 96 P. 697,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1908).

Statute authorizing removal of officers for refusal to perform duties

under liquor statute is not special legislation. State ex rel. Wyckoff v. Ross, 31 Wyo. 500, 228 P. 636,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 1924).

Private School Licensing Act. —

No classification had been created by the Private School Licensing Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

21-2-401

through

21-2-407

, and it was unnecessary to do any further analysis under the test where those institutions that were already accredited obviously did not have to apply to become accredited, and those institutions that were not accredited had to become accredited within the time frame provided; therefore, no equal protection violation occurred because different classifications were not created under the act or the rules adopted by the Wyoming Department of Education. Newport Int'l Univ., Inc. v. State, 2008 WY 72, 186 P.3d 382,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 2008).

School funding. —

A $250,000 cap imposed on transitional hold harmless payments applicable to wealthy school districts subject to revenue recapture bore a rational relationship to a legitimate state interest in making the transition to a cost-based school funding system and thus did not violate the equal protection provisions of the Wyoming Constitution. Lincoln County Sch. Dist. No. One v. State, 985 P.2d 964,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 1999).

Schools'
accreditation process. —

Wyoming had authority to impose reasonable regulations in state educational institutions, and requirement of accreditation of private degree-granting educational institutions was a reasonable restriction, adopted to ensure that quality education was being provided by a private entity licensed in Wyoming; to the extent the accreditation process required a contract between the university and the accrediting entity, need of the state to protect citizens outweighed contract rights of the university.
Newport Int'l Univ., Inc. v. State, 2008 WY 72, 186 P.3d 382,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 2008).

Fixing qualification of newspapers entitled to publish legal notices. —

Statute requiring publication of legal notices in newspapers which had been in existence for one year was not unconstitutional as a special law granting special or exclusive privileges. In re Gillette Daily Journal, 44 Wyo. 226, 11 P.2d 265,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1932).

Act limiting hours of labor for females in hotels and restaurants,

except those operated by railroads, is unconstitutional. State v. Le Barron, 24 Wyo. 519, 162 P. 265,

1917 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1917).

Rational basis exists for treating the employer differently from his employees

with respect to the extent of immunity under § 27-14-104(a), relating to immunity from suit under the Workers' Compensation Act. Mauch v. Stanley Structures, 641 P.2d 1247,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 309

(Wyo. 1982).

Negligence immunity of co-employees unconstitutional. —

The statute which, under the Wyoming worker's compensation scheme, granted immunity from suits by co-employees to employees who were acting within the scope of their employment, §

27-14-104

, is unconstitutional because it violates the Wyoming Constitution's guarantee of equal protection. Mills v. Reynolds, 837 P.2d 48,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 1992).

Unemployment Compensation Act

embraces group of objects or class of subjects and is accordingly not a special but a general law, unless exemption of certain employers makes classification unreasonable. Unemployment Compensation Comm'n v. Renner, 59 Wyo. 437, 143 P.2d 181,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1943).

Liquor licenses. —

Chapter 7, Laws 1909, prohibiting the granting or extending of any liquor license outside of incorporated cities or towns, though impliedly authorizing those holding unexpired licenses to continue in the business until their licenses expire, does not create a privileged class because one whose license expires before the licenses of others may not obtain a license, and it is not in conflict with this section, prohibiting the granting by special laws of any exclusive privilege. State ex rel. Jones v. Board of Comm'rs, 18 Wyo. 153, 105 P. 295,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1909).

Suspension of license unconstitutional. —

Section

31-7-126

(former) and § 31-7-128(f), which provide for the drivers license suspension of individuals under 19 years of age convicted of possession or consumption of alcohol, represent constitutionally prohibited special legislation that lacks rational differentiation from persons aged 19 and 20 who are also denied the right to use alcoholic beverages, constituting a similar class and, for that matter those of any age whose excessive use makes their use illegal. Johnson v. State Hearing Examiner's Office, 838 P.2d 158,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1992).

Section

1-3-111

violates section. —

Section

1-3-111

, which, prior to its 1981 amendment provided, that no action shall be brought more than 10 years after substantial completion of improvement to real property against any person performing or furnishing design, planning, supervision, construction or supervision of construction of the improvement, violated this section and art. 1, §§ 8 and 34, Wyo. Const.Phillips v. ABC Builders, 611 P.2d 821,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 273

(Wyo. 1980).

Constitutionality of §

14-6-203

. —

The statutory scheme of §

14-6-203

is constitutional; there is no demonstrable prejudice arising out of the failure to assign the burden of proof prior to any hearing; and there was no abuse of discretion on the part of the trial judge in refusing to transfer case to juvenile court or on the part of the trial judge in transferring another case to the county court from juvenile court for a preliminary examination with the view that the case would be prosecuted in the district court. Hansen v. State, 904 P.2d 811,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 194

(Wyo. 1995).

Statute of limitations constitutional. —

Section

1-3-111

, which sets forth a statute of limitations for actions involving improvements to real property, is constitutional and does not violate the open courts, uniform operation of general law, and special and local laws provisions of the Wyoming constitution. Worden v. Village Homes, 821 P.2d 1291,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 183

(Wyo. 1991).

Mental Health Professions Practice Act violates equal protection. —

Under the Mental Health Professions Practice Act, private counselors rights to equal protection have been transgressed; none of the evidence demonstrates that supervision by public, licensed counselors results in the qualification of counselors who are more competent or more ethical and, thus, more likely to protect the health, safety, and welfare of the public. The differentiation of the public employer or the charitable employer from the private, for-profit employer cannot be justified as a proper classification and, thus, is not a legitimate exercise in police power. This classification is not founded on a reasonable basis, is arbitrary, and constitutes unwarranted discrimination. It is a violation of equal protection and must be set aside. Allhusen v. State, 898 P.2d 878,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 106

(Wyo. 1995), (decided prior to 2001 amendments to the Mental Health Professions Practice Act).

The mandatory licensure provisions under §

33-38-110

, the prerequisites to licensure found in §

33-38-106

, and the licensure exemptions set forth in §

33-38-103

violate guarantees of equal protection under art. 1, §§ 2 and 34, Wyo. Const. and art. 3, § 27, Wyo. Const.; these provisions must be stricken as contrary to guarantees of equal protection, the guarantee of uniform operation of laws, and as special legislation. The unconstitutional provisions are of no effect, and the law in the form it existed prior to the 1993 amendments is controlling. Allhusen v. State, 898 P.2d 878,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 106

(Wyo. 1995), (decided prior to 2001 amendments to the Mental Health Professions Practice Act).

For discussion of Wyoming Sex Offenders Registration Act as constitutional,

see Snyder v. State, 912 P.2d 1127,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1996).

Cited

in

Huff v. Shumate, 2004 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 27781, 360 F. Supp. 2d 1197 (2004).

§ 28. Signing of bills.

The presiding officer of each house shall, in the presence of the house over which he presides, sign all bills and joint resolutions passed by the legislature immediately after their titles have been publicly read, and the fact of signing shall be at once entered upon the journal.

Substantial compliance is sufficient. —

House journal entry of signing by the speaker is sufficient if it substantially complies with the constitutional requirement. Younger v. Hehn, 12 Wyo. 289, 75 P. 443,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1904).

Enrolled act may be looked to in determining sufficiency of journal entry. —

In determining whether an entry in a legislative journal is a sufficient compliance with this section, the enrolled act exhibiting the proper signature is to be looked to, and the favorable presumption arising therefrom is not to be overthrown unless it clearly appears that it is insufficient. State ex rel. Hynds v. Cahill, 12 Wyo. 225, 75 P. 433,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1904); State ex rel. Smith v. Gillespie, 12 Wyo. 284, 75 P. 1135,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1904).

Failure of journal entry to show that complete title of bill was read. —

Although the entry did not show that the complete title of the bill was read, yet it would be presumed that the speaker had not done his official duty and had not affixed his signature in the absence of such reading, and so the entry was sufficient to show a compliance with the constitutional requirement. Arbuckle v. Pflaeging, 20 Wyo. 351, 123 P. 918,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1912).

Effect of error in designating bill. —

There may be a compliance with this section, notwithstanding an error in the senate journal in designating a bill. George Bolln Co. v. North Platte Valley Irrigation Co., 19 Wyo. 542, 121 P. 22,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1912).

Statute not violative of section. —

Chapter 73, Laws 1897, as amended by ch. 85, Laws 1931, concerning newspapers eligible to publish legal notices, did not violate this section. In re Gillette Daily Journal, 44 Wyo. 226, 11 P.2d 265,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1932).

Quoted

in

Geringer v. Bebout, 10 P.3d 514,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. 2000).

Cited

in

Hansen v. Smith, 395 P.2d 944,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 1964).

§ 29. Legislative employees.

The legislature shall prescribe by law the number, duties and compensation of the officers and employes [employees] of each house, and no payment shall be made from the state treasury, or be in any way authorized to any such person except to an acting officer or employe [employee] elected or appointed in pursuance of law.

Cross references. —

For authority of legislature to hire additional employees when necessary, see §

28-1-103

.

As to senate employees generally, see §

28-3-103

.

As to employees of house of representatives generally, see §

28-4-103

.

§ 30. Extra compensation to public officers prohibited.

No bill shall be passed giving any extra compensation to any public officer, servant or employe, agent or contractor, after services are rendered or contract made.

Cross references. —

As to salaries of public employees generally, see art. 14, §§ 1 to 6, Wyo. Const. For additional provisions concerning extra compensation, see §§

9-3-102

through

9-3-104

.

§ 31. Supplies for legislature and departments.

All stationery, printing, paper, fuel and lights used in the legislature and other departments of government shall be furnished, and the printing and binding of the laws, journals and department reports and other printing and binding, and the repairing and furnishing the halls and rooms used for the meeting of the legislature and its committees shall be performed under contract, to be given to the lowest responsible bidder, below such maximum price and under such regulations as may be prescribed by law. No member or officer of any department of the government shall be in any way interested in any such contract; and all such contracts shall be subject to the approval of the governor and state treasurer.

Violation of this section. —

Wyo. Const. art. 2, § 1 prohibits any person or collection of persons charged with exercising the powers belonging to one of the three branches of government from exercising powers properly belonging to another branch, except as the Constitution expressly directs or permits.
Wyo. Const. art. 3, § 31 expressly requires the state treasurer's approval of contracts for repairing and furnishing areas used by the legislature. Wyoming's capitol restoration legislation assigns all aspects of the project to the governor and other officials and groups created by the legislature. It, therefore, usurps the treasurer's authority under
Wyo. Const. art. 3, § 31 and violates the separation of powers provision of the Wyoming Constitution.
Gordon v. State, 2018 WY 32, 413 P.3d 1093,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 2018).

§ 32. Changing terms and salaries of public officers.

Except as otherwise provided in this constitution, no law shall extend the term of any public officer or increase or diminish his salary or emolument after his election or appointment; but this shall not be construed to forbid the legislature from fixing salaries or emoluments of those officers first elected or appointed under this constitution, if such salaries or emoluments are not fixed by its provisions.

Cross references. —

As to salaries of public officers generally, see art. 14, §§ 1 to 6, Wyo. Const.

As to salaries of county officers, see §§

18-3-107

et seq.

Intent of section. —

This section was intended to secure official independence, and to prevent the legislature from being assailed by the demands of importunate officials, to the detriment of public business. State ex rel. Henderson v. Burdick, 4 Wyo. 272, 33 P. 125,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1893).

Prohibition applies to officer, not to office. —

The prohibition of this section refers to any public officer, his salary and his election or appointment. The prohibition does not apply to an office. Ballangee v. Board of County Comm'rs, 66 Wyo. 390, 212 P.2d 71,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1949).

Section inapplicable to county judge. —

It is only public officers in elective public office and public officers appointed to fill vacancies in elective public offices that are prohibited by this section from receiving an increase or decrease in salary during their terms. Since a county judge is not an elected public official, nor is he appointed to an elective public office, he is not prevented from receiving the salary increase granted by the enactment of §

5-5-119

(now §

5-9-116

).County Court Judges Ass'n v. Sidi, 752 P.2d 960,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 193

(Wyo. 1988).

Mid-term salary increases. —

Cost of living adjustment raises granted by board of county commissioners violated prohibition in Wyoming Constitution against mid-term salary increases for elected officials. Board of County Comm'rs v. State ex rel. Yeadon, 971 P.2d 129,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 187

(Wyo. 1998).

Officer appointed to fill a vacancy was entitled to an increased salary,

provided by the legislature, before his appointment but after the election of his predecessor. Ballangee v. Board of County Comm'rs, 66 Wyo. 390, 212 P.2d 71,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1949).

Privilege of appointing deputies is not an emolument

within the meaning of the constitutional inhibition of this section. Reals v. Smith, 8 Wyo. 159, 56 P. 690,

1899 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1899).

Compensation for use of automobile while traveling on official business. —

Statutory compensation to be paid an officer for the use of his automobile while traveling on official business is not a part of his salary nor an emolument, and may be increased or diminished during the term for which he was elected without violating this section. Taxpayers' League of Carbon County v. McPherson, 49 Wyo. 251, 54 P.2d 897,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1936).

Cessation of housing allowance violates section. —

Where a sheriff, from the beginning of his term, was paid a housing allowance, and thereafter the board of county commissioners ceased payment of the housing allowance, the board's action in terminating the monthly payments violated this section. Park County Bd. of County Comm'rs v. Hodge, 792 P.2d 1390,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 1990).

Effect of change in classification of county or precinct. —

The salary of an officer cannot be changed after his election, though at the time of the change in classification of county he had not yet taken office. Nickerson v. Winslow, 22 Wyo. 259, 138 P. 184,

1914 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 22 Wyo. 259, 138 P. 184,

1914 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1914).

Where the population of the precinct was 1,500 at the time of the election of a justice, though the fact was not determined until thereafter, it was held that he was entitled to a salary which was more than the fees of the office. Davis v. Board of Comm'rs, 4 Wyo. 477, 35 P. 467,

1894 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1894).

Effect of change in assessed valuation of county's property. —

This section prevents a change in the salary of a county treasurer during the term of his office by reason of a change in the assessed valuation of the property in the county. Board of Comm'rs v. Burns, 3 Wyo. 691, 29 P. 894,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 3 Wyo. 691, 29 P. 894,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1892).

No change can be made in the salary of a county clerk during his term, notwithstanding a change in the assessed valuation of the county, which would place it in a higher or lower class. Guthrie v. Board of Comm'rs, 7 Wyo. 95, 50 P. 229,

1897 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1897).

Act providing for the appointment of a county assessor

was not repugnant to this section. Reals v. Smith, 8 Wyo. 159, 56 P. 690,

1899 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1899).

Appropriation to widow of peace officer killed in line of duty. —

This section did not prohibit an appropriation for the benefit of the widow of a peace officer killed in the line of duty. In giving his life, the officer performed a service beyond what it was his legal duty to render, and compensation therefor should not be considered as part of his salary, the increase of which is forbidden by this section. State ex rel. McPherren v. Carter, 30 Wyo. 22, 215 P. 477,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1923).

Quoted

in

Marion v. City of Lander, 394 P.2d 910,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1964).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Murane v. Jack, 52 Wyo. 173, 70 P.2d 888,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 43

, 112 A.L.R. 161 (1937); In re Johnson, 568 P.2d 855,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 313

(Wyo. 1977).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Local Government Law—Platte County's Cost of Living Adjustment: Is It an Unconstitutional In-Term Adjustment of an Elected Officer's Salary?,” see XXXV Land & Water L. Rev. 549 (2000).

§ 33. Origin of revenue bills.

All bills for raising revenue shall originate in the house of representatives; but the senate may propose amendments, as in case of other bills.

Cross references. —

As to taxation and revenue generally, see art. 15, §§ 1 to 20, Wyo. Const., and title 39.

Cited

in

Hansen v. Smith, 395 P.2d 944,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 1964); Rocky Mountain Oil & Gas Ass'n v. State Bd. of Equalization, Dep't of Revenue & Taxation, 749 P.2d 221,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 572

(Wyo. 1987).

§ 34. General appropriation bills; other appropriations.

The general appropriation bills shall embrace nothing but appropriations for the ordinary expenses of the legislative, executive and judicial departments of the state, interest on the public debt, and for public schools. All other appropriations shall be made by separate bills, each embracing but one subject.

Cross references. —

For prohibition of appropriation for sectarian or religious societies or institutions, see art. 1, § 19, Wyo. Const.

As to taxation and revenue generally, see art. 15, §§ 1 to 19, Wyo. Const., and title 39.

Statute fixing salaries of officers and enlisted men of the national guard during encampments

was not continuing appropriation. State ex rel. Davis v. Carter, 31 Wyo. 401, 226 P. 690,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1924).

Appropriation of funds for administration of state instrumentality. —

Section 10, ch. 202, Laws 1975, which appropriated funds for the administration of the Wyoming community development authority, did not violate this section on the ground that said section was not related to ordinary expenses of the legislative, executive and judicial departments of the state and should be enacted by separate bill embracing one subject, since there is no constitutional limitation on the creation of a separate body corporate, as a state instrumentality, to perform governmental functions having a public purpose. With that right goes the implied authority to lend financial support for purely administrative purposes. Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Jamison v. Forsyth, 21 Wyo. 359, 133 P. 521,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(1913); Geringer v. Bebout, 10 P.3d 514,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. 2000).

§ 35. Money expended only on appropriation.

Except for interest on public debt, money shall be paid out of the treasury only on appropriations made by the legislature, and in no case otherwise than upon warrant drawn by the proper officer in pursuance of law.

Cross references. —

As to receipt and disbursement of public funds generally, see §§

9-4-101

to

9-4-107

.

Later enactment controls manner of spending appropriation. —

Later enactment governing expenditure of state funds controls manner of spending legislative appropriations, and approval of attorney's employment in sales tax division under older act could not require auditor to order payment of such attorney's salary unless authorized in appropriation act or by inclusion in budget. State ex rel. Watts v. Jack, 58 Wyo. 108, 125 P.2d 165,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1942).

Contingent fee contract invalid. —

Contract whereby land commissioners hired auditors to investigate debts due state under mineral leases on contingent basis on amount recovered was invalid in its entirety because constitution requires money collected under contract to be paid into state treasury and precludes it from being paid out except pursuant to legislative appropriation and duly issued warrant. MacDougall v. Board of Land Comm'rs, 48 Wyo. 493, 49 P.2d 663,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1935).

Past due, statutorily mandated, salaries payable. —

This section does not make ineffective a peremptory writ of mandamus directing payment of the amount of past due salaries to county court judges on the ground that the legislature failed to appropriate funds for payment of these salaries, as constitutionally required. Section

5-5-119

is effective to appropriate funds for payment. County Court Judges Ass'n v. Sidi, 752 P.2d 960,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 193

(Wyo. 1988).

Statutes providing for salaries. —

An act providing for the salary and contingent fund for examiner operates as an appropriation act, and did not require any other legislation to keep it alive. State ex rel. Henderson v. Burdick, 4 Wyo. 272, 33 P. 125,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1893).

Statute fixing salaries of officers and enlisted men of the national guard during encampments was not continuing appropriation. State ex rel. Davis v. Carter, 31 Wyo. 401, 226 P. 690,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1924).

Provisions of Unemployment Compensation Act constitute continuing appropriation

for specific purpose and are not in violation of this section. Unemployment Compensation Comm'n v. Renner, 59 Wyo. 437, 143 P.2d 181,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1943).

In holding that the Department of Family Services

must employ an accurate standard of need in administering the Aid to Families with Dependent Children program, the Wyoming Supreme Court did not invade the provinces of either the executive or legislative branches; the court did not order the state to participate in the federal program, order the department to set its standard of need at a particular level, or order the department to employ a particular methodology in determining the accurate standard of need, nor did the court order the state to maintain a particular benefit level and therefore did not order an increase in appropriations. Davidson v. Sherman, 848 P.2d 1341,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 1993).

Applied

in

Wyoming State Tax Comm'n v. BHP Petro. Co., 856 P.2d 428,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 1993).

Quoted

in

Mekss v. Wyoming Girls' Sch., 813 P.2d 185,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 1991).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Jamison v. Forsyth, 21 Wyo. 359, 133 P. 521,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(1913); State v. Underwood, 54 Wyo. 1, 86 P.2d 707,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(1939); Witzenburger v. State ex rel. Wyo. Community Dev. Auth., 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo. 1978); Wyodak Res. Dev. Corp. v. Wyo. Dep't of Revenue, 2002 WY 181, 60 P.3d 129,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 217

(Wyo. 2002).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Governmental Immunity from Damage Actions in Wyoming — Part II,” see VII Land & Water L. Rev. 617 (1972).